Missouri, session 2026, SB1009.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 644.021, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 644.021,
to read as follows:
644.021. 1. There is hereby created a water
contaminant control agency to be known as the "Clean Water
Commission of the State of Missouri", whose domicile for the
purposes of sections 644.006 to 644.141 shall be deemed to
be that of the department of natural resources. The
commission shall consist of seven members appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the senate. No more
than four of the members shall belong to the same political
party. All members shall be representative of the general
interest of the public and shall have an interest in and
knowledge of conservation and the effects and control of
water contaminants. At least two members shall be
knowledgeable concerning the needs of agriculture, industry
or mining and interested in protecting these needs in a
manner consistent with the purposes of sections 644.006 to
644.141. At least one member shall be knowledgeable
concerning the needs of publicly owned wastewater treatment
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1009 2
works. No more than four members shall represent the
public. [No member shall receive, or have received during
the previous two years, a significant portion of his or her
income directly or indirectly from permit holders or
applicants for a permit pursuant to any federal water
pollution control act as amended and as applicable to this
state.] The commission shall establish rules of procedure
that specify when members shall exempt themselves from
participating in discussions and from voting on issues
before the commission due to a potential conflict of
interest. All members appointed on or after August 28,
2002, shall have demonstrated an interest and knowledge
about water quality. All members appointed on or after
August 28, 2002, shall be qualified by interest, education,
training or experience to provide, assess and evaluate
scientific and technical information concerning water
quality, financial requirements and the effects of the
promulgation of standards, rules and regulations. At the
first meeting of the commission and at yearly intervals
thereafter, the members shall select from among themselves a
chairman and a vice chairman.
2. The members' terms of office shall be four years
and until their successors are selected and qualified.
Provided, however, that the first three members appointed
shall serve a term of two years, the next three members
appointed shall serve a term of four years, thereafter all
members appointed shall serve a term of four years. There
is no limitation on the number of terms any appointed member
may serve. If a vacancy occurs the governor may appoint a
member for the remaining portion of the unexpired term
created by the vacancy. The governor may remove any
appointed member for cause. The members of the commission

SB 1009 3
shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses actually
and necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.
3. The commission shall hold at least four regular
meetings each year and such additional meetings as the
chairman deems desirable at a place and time to be fixed by
the chairman. Special meetings may be called by three
members of the commission upon delivery of written notice to
each member of the commission. Reasonable written notice of
all meetings shall be given by the director to all members
of the commission. Four members of the commission shall
constitute a quorum. All powers and duties conferred
specifically upon members of the commission shall be
exercised personally by the members and not by alternates or
representatives. All actions of the commission shall be
taken at meetings open to the public. Any member absent
from six consecutive regular commission meetings for any
cause whatsoever shall be deemed to have resigned and the
vacancy shall be filled immediately in accordance with
subsection 1 of this section.
✓